xetex/share/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyphen/uni-cyryodv.tex
% accompanying patterns for cyryo generated from ruhyphdv.tex
% 2004-06-03 converted to Unicode for XeTeX, Jonathan Kew
%
\patterns{
а1бё
а1бьё
а5вё
а1вьё
а1дё
а1ё
а1жё
аз1вё
а1зё
а1кё
а1лё
а1льё
а1мё
а1мьё
а1нё
а1ньё
а1пё
а1пьё
а1рё
а1рьё
а1сё
а1стё
а1тё
а1тьё
а1чё
а1ч2нё
а1чьё
а1шё
а1шьё
а1щё
1бё
бё1др
блё2с1к
5валё
вё5др
вёз1до
1вёр.
д1вё
дё5х
е1бё
е1бьё
е1вё
е1дё
е1ё
е1жё
е1зё
е1лё
е1льё
е1мё
ем1нё
е1нё
е1пё
еп1лё
е1рё
е1рьё
е1сё
е1стё
е1тё
е1тьё
е1чё
е1шё
е1щё
ё1ба
ё1бе
ё1бо
ё1бр
ё1бу
ё1бы
ё1ва
ё1ве
ёв6ку
ё1во
2ёвр
ё2вро
ё1ву
ё1вы
ё1га
ё1ге
ё1ги
ёг1н
ё1го
ё1да
ё1де
ё1ди
ё1до
ё1ду
ё1жа
ёжа6т
ё1же
ё5жи
ё1жу
ё1жью
ё1за
ёз1да
ё1зе
ё1зо
ё1зу
ё1зы
ё1ка
ё1ке
ё1ки
ёк1н
2ё1ко
ё1ку
ё1ла
ё1ле
ё1ло
ё1лу
ё1лы
ё1ма
ё1ме
ё5ми
ём1не
ё1мо
ё1му
ём1ч
ё1мы
ё1на
ё1не
ё1но
ё1ну
ё1ны
ё1па
ё1пе
ёп1ле
ё1по
ёп1та
ё1пу
ё1пы
ё1ра
ё1ре
ё1ро
ёр5тли
ё1ру
ё1ры
ё1рье
ё1рью
ё1рья
ё1са
ё1се
ё1си
ё1ск
ё1со
ё1ста
ё5ста.
ё1сте
ё1сто
ё1стр
ё1сту
ё1сты
ё1су
ё1сы
ё1сье
ё1сьи
ё1сью
ё1сья
ё1та
ё1те
ё1ти
ё1тл
ё1то
ё1тр
ё1ту
ё1ты
ё1тю
ё1тя
ё1ха
ё1хе
ё1хи
ёх1м
ё1хо
ё1ху
ё1це
ё1че
ё1чи
ё1ша
ё1ше
ё1ши
ё1шу
ё1ща
ё1ще
ё1щи
ё1щу
5жёв
ж2жё
заё2
з1дё
з1нё
и1бё
и1бьё
и1вё
и1вьё
и1дё
и1ё
и1жё
и1зё
из5рё
и1кё
и1лё
и1льё
2именё
и1мё
и1нё
и5пё
и1рё
и1сё
и1стё
ис1тёк
и1тё
и1тьё
и1чё
и1чьё
и1шё
и1шьё
и1щё
1каё
1лёде
л1жё
5л6жёш
л1зё
л5чё
5мёд
мё2д1о
1мён.
1мщё
неё6
6нёвк
нё2вра
нёв1ро
но5ё
о1бё
.об1лё
.об1рё
о1бьё
о1вё
о1вьё
о1дё
о1ё
о2ёт
о1жё
о1жьё
о1зё
ои2мё
о1лё
о1льё
о1мё
о1нё
о1ньё
опалё5
о1пё
о1пьё
о1рё
о1рьё
о1сё
ос1кё
о1снё
о1стё
о1счё
2о1тё
отё6п5
о1тьё
о1фё
о1чё
о1шё
о1шьё
о1щё
п6ё
п1лённ
1п2лёт
поё2
причё2с1к
5проё6
ра2с1тёр
1рёза
рё2х1р
ро2г1нё
р1тё
с1дё
1сё
с1мёт
2стёрл
счё2с1к
съё5ма
съё3мо
1течё
1тёка
1тёкш
тём5н
тё1пл
1тёрл
тё6хо
1тлё
тлё5г6
трё2х
5тушёв
у1бё
уб5рё
у1бьё
у1вё
у1вьё
у1дё
у1ё
у1жё
у1жьё
у5лё
у1льё
у1мё
у1нё
у1пё
у1пьё
у1рё
у1рьё
у1сё
у1стё
у1тё
у1тьё
у1чё
у1чьё
у1шё
у1щё
фё1д
2х1вё
.ча2ё
1чёл
.чёр2с
.чёрст5
ш6лём
ш6лёш
ъё2
ъём5н
ы1бё
ы1вё
ы1дё
ы1жё
ы1зё
ы1лё3
ы1льё
ы1мё
ып1лё
ы1рё
ырё2х
ы1рьё
ы1сё
ы1тьё
ы1чё
ыш1лё
ь1вё
ь6щё
ю1дё
ю1ё
ю1нё
я1дё
я1жё
я1зё
я1нё
я1пьё
я1рё
я1сё
я1тё
я1чё
я1щё
}
